District of Columbia statutes.
4-415

Comprehensive child development programs.

(a)

Notwithstanding §§ 4-402 through 4-410, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) shall establish a pilot community-based Quality Improvement Network (“QIN”) composed of:

(1)

Child development hubs, selected through a competitive process, that will provide quality improvement technical assistance and comprehensive services to licensed child development centers and licensed child development homes selected by OSSE to be partners and that agree to meet federal Early Head Start Program Performance Standards for program participation; and

(2)

Child development centers and child development homes, selected through a competitive process, to provide low-income infants and toddlers high-quality, full-day, full-year comprehensive early learning and development services and continuum of care.

(b)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall receive technical assistance from child development hubs to achieve the following within 18 months of being selected by OSSE to participate in the QIN:

(1)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall have adult-to-child ratios and group sizes that meet or exceed federal Early Head Start standards for all children from birth to 3 years of age in child development centers, or as otherwise approved by OSSE.

(2)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall have a comprehensive curriculum or program that is aligned with federal Head Start Program Performance Standards and the District’s early learning and development standards for serving infants, toddlers, and their families.

(3)

Staff who have direct supervision of infants and toddlers at child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall, at a minimum, meet or exceed Early Head Start Standards for staff qualifications or credentials.

(4)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall partner with child development hubs to develop and implement a quality improvement plan, including aligning program policies and procedures to support on-site coaching, professional development, and teacher planning time.

(5)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall provide child-, family-, and program-level data to OSSE and the child development hubs as requested.

(6)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall participate in ongoing, on-site, and desktop monitoring activities to ensure compliance with program requirements and Head Start Program Performance Standards required to remain in good standing with OSSE, the child development hubs, and the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Head Start, if applicable.

(7)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall support comprehensive services for children and families by the child development hubs, including implementation of individualized family service plans.

(8)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall participate in the Child and Adult Care Food Program.

(9)

Child development centers and child development homes within the QIN shall facilitate children’s and families” transitions to Pre-K or Head Start programs.

(c)

OSSE may set payment rates and develop policies and procedures for high-quality early learning and development services set under the authority of this section.

(d)

To be eligible for infant and toddler child development services provided by child-care partners in the QIN, a child shall be a resident of the District of Columbia and between birth and 3 years of age; provided, that a child who turns 3 years old during a program year may continue to receive services for the duration of the program year before transitioning into a pre-kindergarten or Head Start preschool program.

(e)

To the extent possible, priority enrollment shall be given to children between birth and 3 years of age whose families are living at or below the federal poverty level, who are homeless or in the foster care system, or who live with a grandparent, godparent, or relative who is receiving a grandparent caregiver subsidy pursuant to Chapter 2A of this title [§ 4-251.01 et seq.].

(f)

OSSE shall monitor the child development hubs and partner participants in the QIN for adherence to policies and procedures set under the authority of this chapter.

(g)

OSSE may terminate, in whole or in part, the grant provided to a child development hub or partner participant at any time if OSSE determines that the hub or partner participant has:

(1)

Substantially failed to comply with, or meet the objectives and terms of, the grant award; or

(2)

Failed to comply with applicable federal or District laws or regulations.

(h)

OSSE shall continue on-site monitoring for health and safety licensing compliance of child-care partners participating in the QIN; provided, that OSSE may delegate to the child development hubs on-site monitoring of the compliance of participating child development centers and homes with federal Head Start Program Performance Standards; provided, that relevant data collected by child development hubs is regularly reported to OSSE.

History

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 15a
as added Feb. 26, 2016, D.C. Law 21-66, § 2, 62 DCR 16261

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 3-16, § 15a, concerning comprehensive child development programs, see § 2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-238, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1326).
For temporary (225 days) addition of this section, see § 2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-52, Jan. 30, 2016, 62 DCR 15590).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 3-16, § 15a, concerning child development programs, see § 2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-528, Dec. 18, 2014, 62 DCR 1, 20 STAT 4446).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 3-16, § 15a, concerning comprehensive child development programs, see § 2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-184, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14215).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see §  2 of the Early Learning Quality Improvement Network Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-283, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1185).